South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3546.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-1-70. Notwithstanding another provision of law, a public utility that supplies electricity or natural gas pursuant to the provisions of this title may not transfer or apply a delinquent, late, overdue, or unpaid balance from one account to another account held individually or jointly in the same customer's name. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----